Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1014
Retirement committee; established; city council; responsibilities.

(1) A retirement committee shall be established by each city to supervise the general operation of the retirement system established by such city pursuant to the Cities of the First Class Police Officers Retirement Act.

(2) The city council shall continue to be responsible for the general administration of such retirement system unless specific functions or all functions with regard to the administration of the retirement system are delegated, by ordinance, to the retirement committee.

(3) Whenever duties or powers are vested in the city or the retirement committee under the act or whenever the act fails to specifically allocate the duties or powers of administration of retirement systems, such powers or duties shall be vested in the city unless such powers or duties have been delegated by ordinance to the retirement committee.

(4) A city and the retirement committee established by such city shall have all powers that are necessary for or appropriate to establishing, maintaining, managing, and administering the retirement system established by such city.

Laws 1983, LB 237, § 14;

Laws 1992, LB 672, § 17;

Laws 2012, LB1082, § 12;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 206;

Laws 2026, LB822, § 14.
July 18, 2026